Arkansas, session 2025, SB270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-14-111(e)(1)(B), concerning the candidate
filing procedures for school board elections, is amended to read as follows:
(B) During a one-week period beginning at 12:00 noon and
ending at 12:00 noon ninety (90) days before a school election held in
November.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-42-206(b)(1), concerning nominating
petitions for municipal elections, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Any person desiring to become an independent candidate for
municipal office in cities and towns with the mayor-council form of
government shall file his or her petition during a one-week period beginning
at 12:00 noon and ending at 12:00 noon ninety (90) days before the general
election with the county clerk.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 14-47-110(a)(2), concerning the election of
directors in a city manager form of government, is amended to read as
*SSS160*
02/24/2025 9:54:09 AM SSS160

SB270
follows:
(2) The petition mentioned in subdivision (a)(3) of this section
supporting the candidacy of each candidate to be voted upon at any general or
special election shall be filed with the city clerk or recorder during a one-
week period beginning at 12:00 noon and ending at 12:00 noon ninety (90) days
before the election;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 14-48-109(a)(4), concerning the election of
directors and mayor in a city administrator form of government, is amended to
read as follows:
(4) The statement of candidacy and the petition for nomination
supporting the candidacy of each candidate to be voted upon at any general or
special election shall be filed with the city clerk or recorder during the
one-week period beginning at 12:00 noon and ending at 12:00 noon ninety (90)
days before the general election;





















02/24/2025 9:54:09 AM SSS160